Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.007

Committee meetings.

The committee shall from time to time elect a chair from among its members and adopt rules to govern its procedures. Four members of the committee shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business but no proceeding of the committee shall be valid unless carried by the vote of a majority of the members present. The code reviser or a member of his or her staff shall act as secretary of the committee.

[ 2011 c 336 s 1; 2005 c 409 s 3; 1953 c 257 s 3; 1951 c 157 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 409: See note following RCW 1.08.001.